Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF5041.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2025 Supplement, section 80A.66, is amended to read: 80A.66 SECTION 411; POSTREGISTRATION REQUIREMENTS. (a) Financial requirements. Subject to Section 15(h) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 (15 U.S.C. Section 78o(h)) or Section 222 of the Investment Advisers Act of 1940 (15 U.S.C. Section 80b-22), a rule adopted or order issued under this chapter may establish minimum financial requirements for broker-dealers registered or required to be registered under this chapter and investment advisers registered or required to be registered under this chapter. (b) Financial reports. Subject to Section 15(h) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 (15 U.S.C. Section 78o(h)) or Section 222(b) of the Investment Advisers Act of 1940 (15 U.S.C. Section 80b-22), a broker-dealer registered or required to be registered under this chapter and an investment adviser registered or required to be registered under this chapter shall file such financial reports as are required by a rule adopted or order issued under this chapter. If the information contained in a record filed under this subsection is or becomes inaccurate or incomplete in a material respect, the registrant shall promptly file a correcting amendment. (c) Record keeping. Subject to Section 15(h) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 (15 U.S.C. Section 78o(h)) or Section 222 of the Investment Advisers Act of 1940 (15 U.S.C. Section 80b-22): (1) a broker-dealer registered or required to be registered under this chapter and an investment adviser registered or required to be registered under this chapter shall make and maintain the accounts, correspondence, memoranda, papers, books, and other records required by rule adopted or order issued under this chapter; (2) broker-dealer records required to be maintained under paragraph (1) may be maintained in any form of data storage acceptable under Section 17(a) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 (15 U.S.C. Section 78q(a)) if they are readily accessible to the administrator; and (3) investment adviser records required to be maintained under paragraph (d)(1) may be maintained in any form of data storage required by rule adopted or order issued under this chapter. (d) Records and reports of private funds. (1) In general. An investment adviser to a private fund shall maintain such records of, and file with the administrator such reports and amendments thereto, that an exempt reporting adviser is required to file with the Securities and Exchange Commission pursuant to SEC Rule 204-4, Code of Federal Regulations, title 17, section 275.204-4. (2) Treatment of records. The records and reports of any private fund to which an investment adviser provides investment advice shall be deemed to be the records and reports of the investment adviser. (3) Required information. The records and reports required to be maintained by an investment adviser, which are subject to inspection by a representative of the administrator at any time, shall include for each private fund advised by the investment adviser, a description of: (A) the amount of assets under management; (B) the use of leverage, including off-balance-sheet leverage, as to the assets under management; (C) counterparty credit risk exposure; (D) trading and investment positions; (E) valuation policies and practices of the fund; (F) types of assets held; (G) side arrangements or side letters, whereby certain investors in a fund obtain more favorable rights or entitlements than other investors; (H) trading practices; and (I) such other information as the administrator determines is necessary and appropriate in the public interest and for the protection of investors, which may include the establishment of different reporting requirements for different classes of fund advisers, based on the type or size of the private fund being advised. (4) Filing of records. A rule or order under this chapter may require each investment adviser to a private fund to file reports containing such information as the administrator deems necessary and appropriate in the public interest and for the protection of investors. (e) Audits or inspections. The records of a broker-dealer registered or required to be registered under this chapter and of an investment adviser registered or required to be registered under this chapter, including the records of a private fund described in paragraph (d) and the records of investment advisers to private funds, are subject to such reasonable periodic, special, or other audits or inspections by a representative of the administrator, within or without this state, as the administrator considers necessary or appropriate in the public interest and for the protection of investors. An audit or inspection may be made at any time and without prior notice. The administrator may copy, and remove for audit or inspection copies of, all records the administrator reasonably considers necessary or appropriate to conduct the audit or inspection. The administrator may assess a reasonable charge for conducting an audit or inspection under this subsection. (f) Custody and discretionary authority bond or insurance. Subject to Section 15(h) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 (15 U.S.C. Section 78o(h)) or Section 222 of the Investment Advisers Act of 1940 (15 U.S.C. Section 80b-22), a rule adopted or order issued under this chapter may require a broker-dealer or investment adviser that has custody of or discretionary authority over funds or securities of a customer or client to obtain insurance or post a bond or other satisfactory form of security in an amount of at least $25,000, but not to exceed $100,000. The administrator may determine the requirements of the insurance, bond, or other satisfactory form of security. Insurance or a bond or other satisfactory form of security may not be required of a broker-dealer registered under this chapter whose net capital exceeds, or of an investment adviser registered under this chapter whose minimum financial requirements exceed, the amounts required by rule or order under this chapter. The insurance, bond, or other satisfactory form of security must permit an action by a person to enforce any liability on the insurance, bond, or other satisfactory form of security if instituted within the time limitations in section 80A.76(j)(2). (g) Requirements for custody. Subject to Section 15(h) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 (15 U.S.C. Section 78o(h)) or Section 222 of the Investment Advisers Act of 1940 (15 U.S.C. Section 80b-22), an agent may not have custody of funds or securities of a customer except under the supervision of a broker-dealer and an investment adviser representative may not have custody of funds or securities of a client except under the supervision of an investment adviser or a federal covered investment adviser. A rule adopted or order issued under this chapter may prohibit, limit, or impose conditions on a broker-dealer regarding custody of funds or securities of a customer and on an investment adviser regarding custody of securities or funds of a client. (h) Investment adviser brochure rule. With respect to an investment adviser registered or required to be registered under this chapter, a rule adopted or order issued under this chapter may require that information or other record be furnished or disseminated to clients or prospective clients in this state as necessary or appropriate in the public interest and for the protection of investors and advisory clients. (i) Continuing education. A rule adopted or order issued under this chapter may require an individual registered under section 80A.57 or 80A.58 to participate in a continuing education program approved by the Securities and Exchange Commission and administered by a self-regulatory organization, the North American Securities Administrators Association, or the commissioner. new text begin (j) Exemption. An investment adviser who does not have one or more employees is not required to file written supervisory procedures with the administrator. new text end